Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
EFFECT ON EXISTING BANKS

11-101-201. Effect on existing banks.

The charters of the state banks organized and existing prior to July 1, 2013, under the laws of this state continue in full force and effect. All such state banks, and, to the extent applicable, all banks chartered under the laws of another state and all national banks doing business in this state on or after July 1, 2013, are, from that date, subject to this article. Any such state bank, by filing an application under this code for an amendment of its charter or for a merger, consolidation, purchase and assumption, or sale of all, or substantially all, of its assets, or the assets of any department of such bank, shall be deemed to have expressly recognized that it is so subject.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1052, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1464, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-1-103 as it existed prior to 2003.